Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1585.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ART FROM THE INSIDE.new text end new text begin $150,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Humanities Center for a grant to Art From the Inside to use the arts, including but not limited to visual art, poetry, literature, theater, dance, and music, to address the supportive, therapeutic, and rehabilitative needs of incarcerated persons and persons on supervised release and promote a safer correctional facility and community environment. new text end